de_DE.aff
SFX p Y 26
SFX p   auf     äufe      auf
SFX p   auf     äufen     auf
SFX p   aus     äuser     [hH]aus
SFX p   aus     äusern    [hH]aus
SFX p   arkt    ärkte     [mM]arkt
SFX p   arkt    ärkten    [mM]arkt
SFX p   ang     änge      ang
SFX p   ang     ängen     ang
SFX p   uß      üße       uß
SFX p   uß      üßen      uß
SFX p   oß      öße       oß
SFX p   oß      ößen      oß
SFX p   aum     äume      aum
SFX p   aum     äumen     aum
SFX p   ag      äge       ag
SFX p   ag      ägen      ag
SFX p   ug      üge       ug
SFX p   ug      ügen      ug
SFX p   all     älle      all
SFX p   all     ällen     all
SFX p   ass     ässe      ass
SFX p   ass     ässen     ass
SFX p   uss     üsse      uss
SFX p   uss     üssen     uss
SFX p   oss     össe      oss
SFX p   oss     össen     oss
# last ...oss rules are for swiss de_CH only - but do not affect de_DE


SFX R Y 3
SFX R   0       er         [^e]
SFX R   0       ern        [^e]
SFX R   0       r          e


SFX S Y 1
SFX S   0       s          .


SFX q Y 2
SFX q   0       se        s
SFX q   0       sen       s


SFX Q Y 1
SFX Q   0       ses       s
#SFX Q   0       se        s
#SFX Q   0       sen       s


SFX T Y 1
SFX T   0       es         .


SFX J Y 12
SFX J   n       ung        [bgkpßsz]eln
SFX J   n       ungen      [bgkpßsz]eln
SFX J   eln     lung       eln
SFX J   n       ung        ern
SFX J   en      ung        en
SFX J   eln     lungen     eln
SFX J   n       ungen      ern
SFX J   en      ungen      en
SFX J   0       ung        [^n]
SFX J   0       ungen      [^n]
SFX J   el      lung       el
SFX J   el      lungen     el


SFX B N 12
SFX B   n       bar        e[lr]n
SFX B   n       bare       e[lr]n
SFX B   n       baren      e[lr]n
SFX B   n       barer      e[lr]n
SFX B   n       bares      e[lr]n
SFX B   n       barem      e[lr]n
SFX B   en      bar        en
SFX B   en      bare       en
SFX B   en      baren      en
SFX B   en      barer      en
SFX B   en      bares      en
SFX B   en      barem      en


SFX D Y 6
SFX D   0       d          n
SFX D   0       de         n
SFX D   0       den        n
SFX D   0       der        n
SFX D   0       des        n
SFX D   0       dem        n



SFX W Y 5
SFX W   en      0          en
SFX W   n       0          [^e]n
SFX W   st      0          [^s]st
SFX W   t       0          sst
SFX W   t       0          [^s]t


SFX I Y 16
SFX I   n       0          en
SFX I   eln     le         eln
SFX I   n       e          eln
SFX I   ern     re         ern
SFX I   n       e          ern
SFX I   n       t          e[lr]n
SFX I   n       t          [dt]en
SFX I   en      t          [^dimnt]en
SFX I   en      t          eien
SFX I   n       t          [^e]ien
SFX I   n       t          chnen
SFX I   en      t          [^c]h[mn]en
SFX I   n       t          [^aäehilmnoöuür][mn]en
SFX I   en      t          [aäeilmnoöuür][mn]en
SFX I   n       e          un
SFX I   n       t          un


SFX X Y 26
SFX X   n       t          e[lr]n
SFX X   n       t          [dtw]en
SFX X   en      t          eien
SFX X   n       t          [^e]ien
SFX X   en      t          [^ditmnw]en
SFX X   n       t          chnen
SFX X   en      t          [^c]h[mn]en
SFX X   n       t          [^aäehilmnoöuür][mn]en
SFX X   en      t          [aäeilmnoöuür][mn]en
SFX X   n       t          un
SFX X   st      0          tst
SFX X   n       st         e[lr]n
SFX X   n       st         [dtw]en
SFX X   en      st         [^dimnßstwzx]en
SFX X   en      st         eien
SFX X   n       st         [^e]ien
SFX X   n       st         chnen
SFX X   en      st         [^c]h[mn]en
SFX X   n       st         [^aäehilmnoöuür][mn]en
SFX X   en      st         [aäeilmnoöuür][mn]en
SFX X   n       st         un
SFX X   n       st         [ßsxz]en
SFX X   n       st         ssen
SFX X   n       st         schen
SFX X   t       st         [^sz]t
SFX X   t       est        zt


SFX Y Y 36
SFX Y   n       te         e[lr]n
SFX Y   n       te         [dtw]en
SFX Y   en      te         [^dimntw]en
SFX Y   en      te         eien
SFX Y   n       te         [^e]ien
SFX Y   n       te         chnen
SFX Y   en      te         [^c]h[mn]en
SFX Y   n       te         [^aäehilmnoöuür][mn]en
SFX Y   en      te         [aäeilmnoöuür][mn]en
SFX Y   n       test       e[lr]n
SFX Y   n       test       [dtw]en
SFX Y   en      test       [^dimntw]en
SFX Y   en      test       eien
SFX Y   n       test       [^e]ien
SFX Y   n       test       chnen
SFX Y   en      test       [^c]h[mn]en
SFX Y   n       test       [^aäehilmnoöuür][mn]en
SFX Y   en      test       [aäeilmnoöuür][mn]en
SFX Y   n       tet        e[lr]n
SFX Y   n       tet        [dtw]en
SFX Y   en      tet        [^dimntw]en
SFX Y   en      tet        eien
SFX Y   n       tet        [^e]ien
SFX Y   n       tet        chnen
SFX Y   en      tet        [^c]h[mn]en
SFX Y   n       tet        [^aäehilmnoöuür][mn]en
SFX Y   en      tet        [aäeilmnoöuür][mn]en
SFX Y   n       ten        e[lr]n
SFX Y   n       ten        [dtw]en
SFX Y   en      ten        [^dimntw]en
SFX Y   en      ten        eien
SFX Y   n       ten        [^e]ien
SFX Y   n       ten        chnen
SFX Y   en      ten        [^c]h[mn]en
SFX Y   n       ten        [^aäehilmnoöuür][mn]en
SFX Y   en      ten        [aäeilmnoöuür][mn]en


SFX Z Y 15
SFX Z   0       st         [^hßsz]
SFX Z   0       st         [^c]h
SFX Z   0       st         [^s]ch
SFX Z   0       est        [dfkstz]
SFX Z   0       est        ch
SFX Z   0       est        [au]ß
SFX Z   0       est        ieß
SFX Z   0       est        [io]ss
SFX Z   0       t          [^dt]
SFX Z   0       et         [dt]
SFX Z   0       n          e
SFX Z   0       en         ie
SFX Z   0       en         [^e]
SFX Z   0       est        iess
SFX Z   0       est        [au]ss
# last two ...ss rules only used for swiss de_CH - but de_DE is unaffected
